src/acro-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

LEXICON Acronym

 +Use/Circ: FIRSTLETTER ;  ! Dynamically generated acronyms, 	! Remove these from nonrec?
                ! between two and four letters long.
 LETTERNUMBER ; ! Listed (still not monitored)		!
                ! Perhaps we should allow for a final arabic number at
                ! the end of the acronyms, the NRK and NRK2 pattern.
 SOMELONGACRO ; ! Here, we collect some long acronyms, perhaps we should  !
                ! open for dynamic generation of longer acronyms, if this
                ! list gets long.
 smallacro ;    ! This is a pointer to a lexicon of manually listed small-letter
                ! acronyms. They are not generated, since it would interfer with the
                ! ordinary transducer, but listed here, as they then can point to the
                ! same ACRO lexicon as the generated capital-letter acronyms.
! quasiacro ;    move to LEXICON HyphNouns  ! This is compounds with acronyms in the beginning.
                ! They are here since they make compounds with hyphen to the left.

LEXICON FIRSTLETTER	
 B SCND ; C SCND ; Č SCND ; D SCND ; Đ SCND ; F SCND ; G SCND ; 	
 H SCND ; J SCND ; K SCND ; L SCND ; M SCND ; N SCND ; Ŋ SCND ; 	
 P SCND ; R SCND ; S SCND ; Š SCND ; T SCND ; Ŧ SCND ; V SCND ; 	
 W SCND ; X SCND ; Z SCND ; Ž SCND ; 								
 A SCND ; Á SCND ; E SCND ; I SCND ; O SCND ; U SCND ; 				
 Æ SCND ; Ø SCND ; Y SCND ; Ä SCND ; Ö SCND ; Å SCND ; 				



LEXICON SCND													
 B THRD ; C THRD ; Č THRD ; D THRD ; Đ THRD ; F THRD ; G THRD ;	
 H THRD ; J THRD ; K THRD ; L THRD ; M THRD ; N THRD ; Ŋ THRD ;	
 P THRD ; R THRD ; S THRD ; Š THRD ; T THRD ; Ŧ THRD ; V THRD ;	
 W THRD ; X THRD ; Z THRD ; Ž THRD ; 							
 A THRD ; Á THRD ; E THRD ; I THRD ; O THRD ; U THRD ; 			
 Æ THRD ; Ø THRD ; Y THRD ; Ä THRD ; Ö THRD ; Å THRD ; 			
 %- ARABIC ; ARABIC ; 											 ! N-9520 Kárášjohka

LEXICON THRD													
 B FRTH ; C FRTH ; Č FRTH ; D FRTH ; Đ FRTH ; F FRTH ; G FRTH ;	
 H FRTH ; J FRTH ; K FRTH ; L FRTH ; M FRTH ; N FRTH ; Ŋ FRTH ;	
 P FRTH ; R FRTH ; S FRTH ; Š FRTH ; T FRTH ; Ŧ FRTH ; V FRTH ;	
 W FRTH ; X FRTH ; Z FRTH ; Ž FRTH ; 							
 A FRTH ; Á FRTH ; E FRTH ; I FRTH ; O FRTH ; U FRTH ;			
 Æ FRTH ; Ø FRTH ; Y FRTH ; Ä FRTH ; Ö FRTH ; Å FRTH ;			
   ACRO ;														

LEXICON FRTH													
 B ACRO ; C ACRO ; Č ACRO ; D ACRO ; Đ ACRO ; F ACRO ; G ACRO ; 
 H ACRO ; J ACRO ; K ACRO ; L ACRO ; M ACRO ; N ACRO ; Ŋ ACRO ; 
 P ACRO ; R ACRO ; S ACRO ; Š ACRO ; T ACRO ; Ŧ ACRO ; V ACRO ; 
 W ACRO ; X ACRO ; Z ACRO ; Ž ACRO ; 							
 A ACRO ; Á ACRO ; E ACRO ; I ACRO ; O ACRO ; U ACRO ; 			
 Æ ACRO ; Ø ACRO ; Y ACRO ; Ä ACRO ; Ö ACRO ; Å ACRO ;			
 ACRO ;															
! # ; !To prevent cases like :as, `as and as. But this gives tagless 3-letter ACR.

LEXICON ACRO
 +N+ACR: acroconnector ;    ! Here we add the POS tag and go ACRO

LEXICON acroconnector        ! Here comes a set of possible symbols to
               acronull ;    ! put between the abbreviation and its suffix
         :%>%: acrooblique ; ! NRK:as
 +Use/Sub:     acrooblique ; ! NRKas
 +Use/Sub:%>'7 acrooblique ; ! NRK's
 +Use/Sub:%>%` acrooblique ; ! NRK`s
 +Use/Sub:%>%´ acrooblique ; ! NRK´s
               RHyph ;       ! Here we dive over to the compounds: NRK-2, NRK-bargi
 +Use/Sub:     Rreal ;       ! Without hyphen, not normative:  NRK23

LEXICON acronull
+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%> K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%> K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:%> K ;
+Sg+Nom:%>         # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>         # ;
+Sg+Acc:%>         # ;

LEXICON acrooblique
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a      K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:a      K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:ij     K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:i      K ; ! NSR:i
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:s      K ; ! NRK:s
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:as     K ; ! NRK:as
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:in     K ;
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n         K ;	! NBR:n
 +Ess+Use/Sub:an        K ; ! NBR:an ! (check!)
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:at     K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ajd    K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajd    K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajde   K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ajn    K ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:ajgujn K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:t      K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:id9    K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:id9    K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ide    K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:in     K ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:igujn  K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a      # ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:a      # ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:ij     # ;
 +Sg+Ill:i              # ; ! NSR:i
 +Sg+Loc:s              # ; ! NRK:s
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:as     # ; ! NRK:as
 +Sg+Com:in             # ;
 +Ess:n                 # ;	! NBR:n
 +Ess+Use/Sub:an        # ; ! NBR:an ! (check!)
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:at     # ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ajd    # ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajd    # ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajde   # ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ajn    # ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:ajgujn # ;
 +Pl+Nom:t              # ;
 +Pl+Gen:id9            # ;
 +Pl+Acc:id9            # ;
 +Pl+Ill:ide            # ;
 +Pl+Loc:in             # ;
 +Pl+Com:igujn          # ;

!------Der/ár------
 +Der1+Der/ár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:»ár GAHPIRLONG ;  !

LEXICON LETTERNUMBER
A5 ACRO ;
MP3 ACRO ;
UTF-8 ACRO ;
2-C ACRO ;
3-A ACRO ;
10-Đ ACRO ;
A/S ACRO ;
L/L ACRO ;
LU2 ACRO ;
D/S ACRO ;
dČA/AciA:dČA0%/AciA ACRO ;
O97 ACRO ;
4/OPYC:4%/OPYC ACRO ;
CSM_1:CSM%_1 ACRO ;
NRK1 ACRO ;
TV2 ACRO ;
U-19 ACRO ;
U-23 ACRO ;
L-97 ACRO ;
LA21 ACRO ;
SWER99TM ACRO ;
H1N ACRO ;
P2 ACRO ;
P4 ACRO ;
P-2 ACRO ;
P-4 ACRO ;
T5PC ACRO ;
km/d ACRO ;
mp3 ACRO ;
SVT2 ACRO ;
TV4 ACRO ;
LEXICON SOMELONGACRO		
 EXFACFON+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:EXFACFON ACRO;	 !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat		!
AB ACRO ;
 ACTA+Use/Sub:ACTA ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
BNB ACRO ;
ADSL ACRO ;
AFS ACRO ;
HV ACRO ;
KFK ACRO ;
AL ACRO ;
MGP ACRO ;
ISAN ACRO ;
AMT ACRO ;
ANC ACRO ;
ANS ACRO ;
KSG	ACRO ;
RDA ACRO ;
ER ACRO ;
AP ACRO ;
AS ACRO ;
NTNU ACRO ;
MD ACRO ;
ASS ACRO ;
AT ACRO ;
ATSIC ACRO ;
AUF ACRO ;
BK ACRO ;
TCO ACRO ;
FNUC ACRO ;
EKG ACRO ;
AYC ACRO ;
 BASIC+Use/Sub:BASIC ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
SAFE ACRO ;
 ENØK+Use/Sub:ENØK ACRO; !  - proper according to čállinrávvagat
SJ ACRO ;
VR ACRO ;
AN ACRO ;
SSO ACRO ;
BB ACRO ;
BBC ACRO ;
BD ACRO ;
BES ACRO ;
BMB ACRO ;
AU ACRO ;
BOF ACRO ;
BONO ACRO ;
BPA ACRO ;
BSS ACRO ;
BU ACRO ;
NRQ ACRO ;
BUORIT ACRO ;
BUP ACRO ;
CD ACRO ;
CERD ACRO ;
CNN ACRO ;
 COOP+Use/Sub:COOP ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
IRE ACRO ;
RAF ACRO ;
CV ACRO ;
DAB ACRO ;
 ILIOS+Use/Sub:ILIOS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
DBE ACRO ;
DE ACRO ;
DFD ACRO ;
DILLI ACRO ;
DJ ACRO ;
SGR ACRO ;
KISP ACRO ;
SGSBL ACRO ;
SRJ ACRO ;
DON ACRO ;
DS ACRO ;
DSF ACRO ;
DSJ ACRO ;
DT ACRO ;
DVD ACRO ;
DÁ ACRO ;
EAI ACRO ;
 ECHAM+Use/Sub:ECHAM ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
ED ACRO ;
EEK ACRO ;
EFS ACRO ;
EGD ACRO ;
ENA ACRO ;
EP ACRO ;
ESA ACRO ;
ÁVD ACRO ;
EZLN ACRO ;
FA ACRO ;
FAF ACRO ;
FAS ACRO ;
FD ACRO ;
FFF ACRO ;
FGDL ACRO ;
FIM ACRO ;
FK ACRO ;
FMX ACRO ;
FO ACRO ;
FS ACRO ;
FUOM ACRO ;
GB ACRO ;
GFDL-R ACRO ;
NOPA ACRO ;
GHVS ACRO ;
GJ ACRO ;
GJSS ACRO ;
GLR ACRO ;
GOD ACRO ;
GPS ACRO ;
GSM ACRO ;
GWAPA ACRO ;
HE ACRO ;
HFK ACRO ;
HK ACRO ;
HRW ACRO ;
HVS ACRO ;
IBM ACRO ;
ICC ACRO ;
ID ACRO ;
IFU ACRO ;
III ACRO ;
IKO ACRO ;
IL ACRO ;
ILO ACRO ;
IMA ACRO ;
IN ACRO ;
IPS ACRO ;
ISBN ACRO ;
IT ACRO ;
IW ACRO ;
JA ACRO ;
JK ACRO ;
JPG ACRO ;
JSL ACRO ;
JUS ACRO ;
KBB ACRO ;
KF ACRO ;
KIBK ACRO ;
KJJS ACRO ;
KKS ACRO ;
KOAS ACRO ;
KRD ACRO ;
 KRIPOS+Use/Sub:KRIPOS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
KSS ACRO ;
LA ACRO ;
LEA ACRO ;
LHL ACRO ;
LLH ACRO ;
LMS ACRO ;
LO ACRO ;
LU ACRO ;
MBD ACRO ;
MB ACRO ;
MC ACRO ;
MGD ACRO ;
MIELDE ACRO ;
ML ACRO ;
MMI ACRO ;
MNP ACRO ;
MS-DOS ACRO ;
 MUVÁ+Use/Sub:MUVÁ ACRO; ! MuVá
MY ACRO ;
NA ACRO ;
NAF ACRO ;
 NATO+Use/Sub:NATO ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
NB ACRO ;
NBR-N ACRO ;
NEG ACRO ;
NGU ACRO ;
NIBR ACRO ;
NILF ACRO ;
NINA-NIKU ACRO ;
NJFF ACRO ;
NLS ACRO ;
RWGYI ACRO ;
NMK ACRO ;
NN ACRO ;
NOK ACRO ;
 NORAD+Use/Sub:NORAD ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 NORUT+Use/Sub:NORUT ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
NOU ACRO ;
NSD ACRO ;
EG ACRO ;
NSR ACRO ;
NTB ACRO ;
NU ACRO ;
NÁČ ACRO ;
 OAFIR+Use/Sub:OAFIR ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 OASIS+Use/Sub:OASIS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
OD ACRO ;
OG ACRO ;
OHCAN ACRO ;
 ODIN+Use/Sub:ODIN ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
OL ACRO ;
ON ACRO ;
ORO ACRO ;
OSL ACRO ;
OVDAL ACRO ;
PC ACRO ;
PETA ACRO ;
PFL ACRO ;
FLL ACRO ;
PIPE ACRO ;
POOGP ACRO ;
PPB ACRO ;
PS ACRO ;
RAG ACRO ;
RBL ACRO ;
RKTL ACRO ;
RO ACRO ;
RS ACRO ;
RSS ACRO ;
RV ACRO ;
SAK ACRO ;
SAS ACRO ;
SAÁO ACRO ;
SBB ACRO ;
SBSS ACRO ;
SDD ACRO ;
SDGB ACRO ;
SDS ACRO ;
 SEFO+Use/Sub:SEFO ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
SEK ACRO ;
SF- ACRO ;
SFF ACRO ;
SFO ACRO ;
SFS ACRO ;
SG ACRO ;
SGP ACRO ;
SI ACRO ;
SJSBS ACRO ;
SK ACRO ;
SKS ACRO ;
SLF ACRO ;
SM ACRO ;
SN ACRO ;
SNF ACRO ;
SNO ACRO ;
SOF ACRO ;
SOL ACRO ;
SOS ACRO ;
SKUP ACRO ;
SP ACRO ;
SPR ACRO ;
SR ACRO ;
SS ACRO ;
SSB ACRO ;
SSG ACRO ;
SSN ACRO ;
SSS ACRO ;
STIL ACRO ;
SUF ACRO ;
SUPU+Use/Sub:SUPU ACRO ; !proper
SV ACRO ;
SVF ACRO ;
SVL-N ACRO ;
SVT ACRO ;
SÁB ACRO ;
 SÁLAS+Use/Sub:SÁLAS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
Sámi-TV ACRO ;
TAC ACRO ;
FM ACRO ;
TONO ACRO ;
TSI ACRO ;
TD ACRO ;
UB ACRO ;
UD ACRO ;
UDSL ACRO ;
UKM ACRO ;
UNEP ACRO ;
UNG ACRO ;
UNHCR ACRO ;
 UNICEF+Use/Sub:UNICEF ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
UNN ACRO ;
URACCAN ACRO ;
USA ACRO ;
UV ACRO ;
SMK ACRO ;
GD ACRO ;
JPD ACRO ;
MEAHC ACRO ;
OT ACRO ;
PPS ACRO ;
SOD ACRO ;
BHD ACRO ;
 VEFAS+Use/Sub:VEFAS ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
VI ACRO ;
VIII ACRO ;
OVB ACRO ;
VS ACRO ;
VW ACRO ;
WCIP ACRO ;
WRH ACRO ;
LSD ACRO ;
WIVC ACRO ;
WTO ACRO ;
RSFSR ACRO ;
VUK ACRO ;
WWF ACRO ;
XX ACRO ;
EØF ACRO ;
YSS ACRO ;
mánáid-TV:mánáid9-TV ACRO ;
siskkáldas-TV ACRO ;
teaksta-TV ACRO ;
 ÁLGU+Use/Sub:ÁLGU ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 UNIKOM+Use/Sub:UNIKOM ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 COCOM+Use/Sub:COCOM ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
 COMECON+Use/Sub:COMECON ACRO; !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
LEXICON smallacro
BbNS ACRO ;
DjO ACRO ;
cd ACRO ;
akseanta-a ACRO ;
teaksta-tv ACRO ;
Sam^IT ACRO ;
Brokkoli% MT ACRO ;
AciA ACRO ;
Art ACRO ;
BfS ACRO ;
DnB ACRO ;
SoL ACRO ;
pps ACRO ;
kB ACRO ;
kVA ACRO ;
FBb ACRO ;
FGb ACRO ;
 FeFo+Use/Sub:FeFo ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
Frp ACRO ;
Dsj ACRO ;
Gb ACRO ;
Gwh ACRO ;
ImO ACRO ;
Sgb ACRO ;
Ji ACRO ;
SVL-Fi ACRO ;
KiMK ACRO ;
KoKS ACRO ;
KrÁ ACRO ;
ráđđehus.no+Use/Sub:ráđđehus.no ACRO ;
Infonuorra.no+Use/Sub:Infonuorra.no ACRO ;
LaW ACRO ;
MiF ACRO ;
 MuVá+Use/Sub:MuVá ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
NgL ACRO ;
 Norfu+Use/Sub:Norfu ACRO;  !  - propername according to čállinrávvagat
Rp:Rp9 ACRO ;
SamS ACRO ;
DuÅ ACRO ;
SfF ACRO ;
StA ACRO ;
SvJT ACRO ;
UiO ACRO ;
SkL ACRO ;
Bq ACRO ; 
GWh ACRO ;
Hz ACRO ;
MHz ACRO ;
RáB ACRO ; !Kristelig folkeparti, KrF
bfr ACRO ; !
cm ACRO ; !
cot ACRO ; !
dis ACRO ; !disdat
dm:dm9 ACRO ; !desimehtar
fob:fob9 ACRO ;
hl ACRO ; !
jk1 ACRO ;
kV ACRO ;
kb/s ACRO ; !kilobytes per second
km3 ACRO ;
lc ACRO ;
m2 ACRO ;
maŋ ACRO ; !máŋŋebárga
mm3 ACRO ;
mp ACRO ;
pH ACRO ;
rbl ACRO ;
sotn ACRO ; !Sotnabeaivi
wo ACRO ;
Searvg.ped:Searvg.ped9 ACRO ;
borg:borg9 ACRO ;
golg:golg9 ACRO ; !
mies ACRO ; !
ođđj ACRO ;
